Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 1. In General
2016 amendment, by ch. 62 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, in (a)(x) in the third sentence, inserted “or a charter school operating pursuant to a contract with the district” following “If the district” and inserted “or the charter school” preceding “is the lessee,” and inserted “of the district or the charter school” in the last sentence; redesignated former (a)(ii)(B) as (a)(ii)(C), added (a)(ii)(B), and inserted “or a charter school” in the first sentence of (a)(ii)(C).

The second
2016 amendment, by ch. 105 § 3, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “state construction department” for “school facilities department” wherever it occurred in (a)(x), (a)(x)(A), (a)(x)(B), and (a)(xxvii); and in (a)(x)(B) substituted “the department” for “the construction management program within the general services division of the department of administration and information.”

The third
2016 amendment, by ch. 113 § 1, effective July 1, 2017, at the beginning of (a)(xxiv), substituted “Adopt” for “Establish,” in the present last sentence, substituted “adopted” for “established,” and deleted the former last two sentences, which read, “Beginning school year 2013–2014 and each school year thereafter, a component of the district assessment system shall include common benchmark adaptive assessments for reading and mathematics in grades two (2) through eight (8), common to all districts statewide, administered at least two (2) times during any one (1) school year and administered once in grade one (1). An additional component of the district assessment system shall continue the longitudinal study of summer school program effectiveness which uses a single common benchmark adaptive assessment in reading and mathematics administered for summer school and extended day intervention and remediation programs in accordance with
W.S. 21-13-334(h)(iv)”; in (a)(xxix), in the first sentence, substituted “2017–2018” for “2012–2013,” inserted “or dates” following “date,” deleted “curriculum based, achievement” following “standardized,” and substituted “or a career readiness examination” for “a computer-adaptive college placement assessment or for students enrolled in eleventh or twelfth grade, a jobs skills assessment test,” in the second sentence deleted “or for students in the eleventh or twelfth grade, the jobs skills assessment test” following “examinations,” inserted “or date” following “dates,” in the last sentence deleted “or jobs skills assessment test taken” following “examinations”; and made stylistic changes.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 14, § 1, added (a)(xxxv).

Laws 2017, ch. 14, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 16, 2017.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(xxx), inserted “each year,” substituted “professional standards established by the state board of education” for “statewide education accountability system established,” deleted “Not later than August 15, 2019 and August 15 of each school year thereafter, in accordance with rules and regulations of the state board, the district board shall also provide the state board written reports verifying school district leader performance and providing performance scores” following “education under,” and substituted “ W.S. 21-2-304(b)(xvi)” for “ W.S.

21-2-204

.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (a)(xxxvi).

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, ch 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(xvii) and (xviii), deleted "Not later than school year 2019-2020 and each school year thereafter," in (a)(xvii), substituted "evaluated once a year against the school district's standards for performance, as submitted and approved pursuant to W.S. 21-2-304(b)(xv). The evaluation shall be in writing and an opportunity for feedback to improve performance shall be provided" for "evaluated summatively based in part upon student achievement measures as prescribed by rule and regulation of the state board under W.S. 21-2-304(b)(xv)," in (a)(xviii), substituted "evaluated against the school district's standards for performance, as submitted and approved pursuant to W.S. 21-2-304(b)(xv), once a year until the teacher has been classified as effective under the performance evaluation system utilized by the school district for two (2) consecutive years. Upon a classification of effective for two (2) consecutive years, evaluation shall occur at minimum once every three (3) years" for "evaluated summatively based in part upon student achievement measures as prescribed by rule and regulation of the state board under W.S. 21-2-304(b)(xv)," and in (a)(xix), substituted "Performance evaluations required under paragraphs (a)(xvii) and (xviii) of this section shall" for "Not later than school year 2019-2020 and each school year thereafter, based in part upon student achievement measures established by the state board of education under W.S. 21-2-304(b)(xv), performance evaluations shall."

The second 2019 amendment, Laws 2019, ch 84, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (b), which read: "On or before June 1, 2020 and June 1 of each school year thereafter, each school district superintendent shall provide a report to the board of trustees identifying all teachers and on or before June 1, 2019, and June 1 of each school year thereafter, identifying all school and district leaders within the district whose performance, through evaluations conducted under paragraphs (a)(xvii) through (xix) and (xxx) of this section, has been determined in need of improvement or ineffective for that school year. The report shall include a summary of mentoring and other professional development activities made available to the identified school and district leaders and teachers to improve instruction and student achievement. Not later than July 1, 2019 for school and district leaders, and July 1, 2020 for district teachers, and July 1 of each school year thereafter, the board shall file a report with the department of education certifying compliance with this subsection."

Laws 2019, ch 134, § 1 effective February 27, 2019, in (a)(viii), deleted "when any school building is to be built, when any repairs, additions or improvements costing more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) and less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) are to be made to any school building, facility or other district property, or" in the first sentence, added "of the purchase of insurance, supplies or materials other than textbooks is equal to or" in the second sentence, and added the third and last sentences.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(viii), added “A district shall independently meet the requirements of this paragraph when procuring goods or services that are subject to this paragraph through a board of cooperative educational services” as the seventh sentence.

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 29, § 2, effective October 1, 2020, in (a)(viii), added “and on the state procurement website, as defined in W.S. 9-2-3001(b)(vii)” at the end of the second sentence, substituted “For any contract for a capital construction project with an estimated value in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), the board shall publish a call for bids in a newspaper of general circulation in the district” for “When any school building is to be built costing fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) or more or when any repairs, additions or improvements costing fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) or more are to be made to any school building, facility or other district property, the board shall obtain competitive bids and publish a call for bids in a newspaper of general circulation in the state,” added “All contracts for capital construction projects shall be let in accordance with W.S.

9-2-3004

and

9-2-3006

except as provided in this paragraph” as the present fourth sentence, substituted “in any bid, as defined in W.S. 9-2-3001(b)(v)” for “in the bidding,” and deleted the last sentence, which read “The requirements of this paragraph shall not apply to the procurement of professional services of architects, engineers or surveyors when the board seeks to procure professional services pursuant to W.S.

9-2-1027

through

9-2-1033

.”

The third 2020 amendment, by ch. 30, § 1, effective October 1, 2020, added (a)(xxxvii).

The fourth 2020 amendment, by ch. 43, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(viii) substituted “more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00)” for “more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00),” “less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)” for “less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00),” and “exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)” for “exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00).”

The fifth 2020 amendment, by ch. 70, § 1, redesignated former (a)(x)(B) as the introductory language of (a)(x)(B), (a)(x)(B)(I) and (a)(x)(B)(II); added (a)(x)(B)(III) and made related changes.

The sixth 2020 amendment, by ch. 159, § 1, effective August 1, 2021, added (a)(xxxvii).

This section has been set out as reconciled by the legislative services office.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “career and technical” for “vocational” in the second sentence of (a)(ii)(A); and substituted “career and technical” for “career-vocational” in (a)(xxviii).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 131, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “21-15-117” for “21-15-115” in the first sentence of (a)(x).

The third 2021 amendment, by ch. 163, § 1, effective August 1, 2021, added (a)(xxxix).

The fourth 2021 amendment, by ch. 169, § 2, effective July 1, 2022, substituted “within the boundaries of” for “pursuant to a contract with” in the third sentence of (a)(x); deleted “by the district” following “approved” in (a)(x)(A)(I); and added “applicable” in (a)(x)(A)(II).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2022 amendments. —

The first 2022 amendment, by ch. 4, § 1, effective July 1, 2022, in the first sentence of (a)(xxxix), deleted “‘habitual truancy’ and” following “Define” and added “, “‘habitual truant’ and ‘willful absenteeism’” following “‘unexcused absence’.”

The second 2022 amendment, by ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022, substituted “world” for “foreign” preceding “languages” in (a)(ii)(A).

Effective Dates.—

Laws 2019, ch. 134 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 27, 2019.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2015, ch. 30, amending this section, states in relevant part: “in accordance with Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300 (Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014)”.

Laws 2015, ch. 179, amending this section , states in relevant part: “conforming Wyoming Statute to Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300 and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Laws 2014, ch. 27, § 2 superseded alternative provisions in section 1 of the act and became effective July 1, 2014, upon the Governor's certification of the issuance of a final court order as specified in section 3(a) of the act.

Educational data systems. —

Laws 2003, ch. 131, § 4, directs the state department of education to acquire necessary data software to support the requirements of the body of evidence assessment systems implemented by school districts as required by W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxiv) to determine levels of student performance and to comply with state graduation requirements. The department is to issue a request for proposal (RFP) in consultation with the SBET advisory group, enabling software to be fully functional by school year 2004-2005. The SBET advisory group is to assist the department in reviewing and evaluating all proposals submitted in response to the RFP. Following review and evaluation and if a proposal is accepted, meets the requirements of this section and is approved by the SBET advisory group, the state department is to enter into contract to implement the proposal, subject to available funds. The section further establishes a design team, to be comprised of seven members as specified in the section, to assist the state superintendent of public instruction in the investigation, development and implementation of a statewide education data system, which is to provide a statewide capability to share and access educational information between school districts and the state, through common labeling and storage of data, both internally for school district use and externally for state and federal data collections. On or before December 31, 2003, and on behalf of the design team, the state superintendent of public instruction is to report to the joint education interim committee on a proposed statewide data system developed pursuant to the act. Recommendations are to be structured to enable implementation during the 2005-2006 school year, and are to include necessary enabling legislation. One million dollars is appropriated from the general fund to the state department of education to implement this section.

Laws 2003, ch. 131 § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2003.

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 2, subsection 5, effective July 1, 2004, directs that of the federal fund appropriation and in response to the information and reporting requirements imposed by the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001, $1,500,000.00 is to be expended for the continuing development and implementation of the statewide education data system established under 2003 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 131, Section 327(b). The expenditure of these funds is to include infrastructure development, software upgrading, staff training, central data management application, student identification applications, data processing and system management and oversight.

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 2, subsection 205, effective July 1, 2004, directs that of the school foundation program account appropriation, $1,000,000 is to only be expended by the department of education for the continuing implementation and operation of the student performance data system as provided by 2003 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 131, Section 327(a) and the continuing development and implementation of the statewide education data system established under 2003 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 131, Section 327(b).

Laws 2005, ch. 121, § (3)(d), effective July 1, 2005, appropriates $300,000 from amounts within the school foundation program account to the department for the continuation of the student performance data system pilot projects implemented by the standards and body of evidence tracking (SBET) advisory group in accordance with Laws 2003, ch. 131, § 327(a). The appropriation is for continuance of projects during the period July 1, 2005 through June 30, 2006.

Applicability.—

Laws 2019, ch. 134 § 2, provides: "This act shall apply only to procurement activities initiated on or after the effective date of this act."

Board has wide discretion in management of district's affairs

and will not be interfered with by the courts unless its actions are shown to be arbitrary, capricious or fraudulent. Hyatt v. Big Horn Sch. Dist., 636 P.2d 525,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1981).

School district not entitled to eleventh amendment immunity. —

Although a school district obtains more than 1/4 of its funds from the state of Wyoming, the school district on balance is not entitled to an eleventh amendment immunity as an arm of the state of Wyoming. Stoddard v. School Dist., 429 F. Supp. 890, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16623 (D. Wyo. 1977), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 590 F.2d 829, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17844 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Since board is more like county than arm of state. —

The characteristics of Wyoming school districts demonstrate that in Wyoming on balance a local school board is more like a county or city than it is like an arm of the state. Stoddard v. School Dist., 429 F. Supp. 890, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16623 (D. Wyo. 1977), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 590 F.2d 829, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17844 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

School district is not authorized to adopt four-day school week,

resulting in a 144-day school year. Johnston v. Board of Trustees, 661 P.2d 1045,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1983).

Entries upon minutes as to claim. —

Warrant regularly drawn, in pursuance of a vote to issue warrants to pay a valid indebtedness, is not rendered invalid because minutes of the board contained no record of presentation of the claim, its audit and allowance, or of an order for the issuance of the warrant. School Dist. No. 3 v. School Dist. No. 3 v. Western Tube Co., 13 Wyo. 304, 80 P. 155,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1895).

Sufficiency of advertising for bids. —

Where building committee advertised for bids for construction of schoolhouse and installation of heating plant, and awarded separate contracts to different bidders at different times, the amount of the two contracts exceeding the funds derived from bond issue authorized, but being less than funds available for building purposes, there was a sufficient advertisement for bids to authorize the contract for heating plant, even though awarded at a later date. School Dist. No. 3 v. School Dist. No. 3 v. Western Tube Co., 13 Wyo. 304, 80 P. 155,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1895).

Evaluation policy, rules, inapplicable to untenured teachers. —

A school district's evaluation policy and rules, which were adopted primarily for use in performing operational and supervisory duties, did not protect initial contract teachers from dismissal because, as teachers without tenure, they could be dismissed even after receiving favorable evaluations. Leonard v. Converse County Sch. Dist. No. 2, 788 P.2d 1119,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1990).

As is implied covenant, public policy. —

The implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing and the public policy exception to the employment-at-will doctrine do not apply to the termination of employment contracts between school districts and initial contract teachers. Leonard v. Converse County Sch. Dist. No. 2, 788 P.2d 1119,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1990).

Allegations presented to board regarding improper conduct by principal deemed privileged. —

Allegations presented to a school board by parents and teachers, in their effort to obtain a termination of a high school principal, premised upon various incidents involving the principal, such as improper sexual advances and medical treatment, were not “outrageous,” such as to support an action of intentional infliction of emotional distress, and, further, were privileged. Spurlock v. Ely, 707 P.2d 188,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 583

(Wyo. 1985).

Board authorized to close school. —

School board had authority to close a county high school where decision was based upon substantial evidence, including host of variables and options, and was accordingly not arbitrary or capricious. See Ward v. Board of Trustees, 865 P.2d 618,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1993).

Public inspection of names and salaries of school district employees. —

In granting summary judgment in favor of a newspaper, the district court properly ruled as a matter of law that the newspaper was entitled to information concerning the names and salaries of individual employees of a school district.
Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One v. Cheyenne Newspapers, 2011 WY 55, 250 P.3d 522,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2011).

Applied

in

Board of Trustees v. Colwell, 611 P.2d 427,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 267

(Wyo. 1980); Milton v. Mitchell, 762 P.2d 372,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1988).

Quoted

in

Teton Plumbing & Heating, Inc. v. Board of Trustees, 763 P.2d 843,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1988); Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 907 P.2d 1238,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

In re Seyfang, 563 P.2d 1376,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1977).

Law reviews. —

For note, “The Common-Law Rule Against Holding Incompatible Offices — Abolishing the ‘Office’ Limitation,” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 667 (1974).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Zoning regulations as applied to public elementary and high schools, 74 ALR3d 136.

Validity of local or state denial of public school courses or activities to private or parochial school students, 43 ALR4th 776.